Hawaii, session 2026, SB1661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $394,122,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the sixth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Water Reservoir A.   Plans, design, and construction for an R-1 water reservoir; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                         $10,000,000 2.   Lahaina Bypass Road, Maui A.   Plans, land acquisition, design, construction, and equipment for an extension of the Lahaina bypass road from North Keawe street to beyond Puukolii road. Plans                            $1,000 Land acquisition                 $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                $69,996,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                         $70,000,000 3.   Kihei Bypass Road, Maui A.   Plans for the Kihei bypass from Maui meadows north of Piilani highway to Kulanihakoi high school. Total funding                            $200,000 4.   Kulanihakoi High School A.   Plans, land acquisition, design, and construction for an ADA‑compliant grade-separated crossing. Plans                            $1,000 Land acquisition                 $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                $19,996,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                         $20,000,000 5.   Lahainaluna High School A.   Plans, design, and construction for on-campus school staff housing. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                $19,998,000 Total funding                         $20,000,000 6.   Kamalii Elementary School A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for new heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system. Plans                            $1,000 Design                           $1,000 Construction                 $2,497,000 Equipment                        $1,000 Total funding                          $2,500,000 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment for the roofing of building C. Plans                          $  1,000 Design                         $  1,000 Construction                   $317,000 Equipment                      $  1,000 Total funding                            $320,000 7.   Kihei Elementary School A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment for special education classroom building. Total funding                         $18,000,000 8.   Lahaina Elementary School A.   Plans, design, and construction for a new Lahaina elementary school; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                        $131,000,000 9.   Lahaina Intermediate School A.   Plans, design, ground site improvements, and construction for a community gym and civil defense shelter, including a kitchen, restroom, and showering facilities. Total funding                          $2,000,000 10.  New Central Maui School A.   Plans, design, and construction for a new central Maui school; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                        $100,000,000 11.  Princess Nahienaena Elementary School A.   Design and construction to demolish and replace an old, unusable piece of playground equipment. Design                          $12,000 Construction                    $70,000 Total funding                             $82,000 B.   Design and construction to demolish, resurface, and cover basketball court. Design                         $  1,000 Construction                   $534,000 Total funding                            $535,000 C.   Design, construction, and equipment for split air conditioner units for F building. Design                         $ 15,000 Construction                   $181,000 Equipment                      $ 15,000 Total funding                            $211,000 12.  Rock Wall Repairs and Storm Mitigation A.   Plans, design, and construction for rock wall repairs and storm mitigation at TMK 3-9-001-012-0000. Design                         $  1,000 Construction                   $273,000 Total funding                            $274,000 13.  Kahoolawe Island Reserve Commission A.   Plans, design, and construction for the Kahoolawe island reserve commission educational center exhibition, including updates to community planning and museum exhibition. Plans                          $350,000 Design                       $3,000,000 Construction                   $900,000 Total funding                          $4,250,000 14.  Pohakea fire prevention and suppression infrastructure A.   Plans, design, and construction for fire prevention and suppression infrastructure. Total funding                          $1,750,000 15.  Lahaina Small Boat Harbor A.   Construction for maintenance dredging. Total funding                          $5,000,000 B.   Construction for the reconstruction of the outer marginal wharf; equipment and appurtenances. Total funding                          $8,000,000 SECTION 2. The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section l shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sum appropriated in item l shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services; provided that the department shall receive a dollar‑for-dollar match from the county of Maui; (2)  The sum appropriated in item 2 and item 3 shall be expended by the department of transportation; (3)  The sum appropriated in items 4 through 11 shall be expended by the department of education; and (4)  The sums appropriated in items l2 through 15 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 3. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________